District of Columbia statutes.
36-201

Adoption of label authorized; filing; certified copies.

A union or association of employees in the District of Columbia may adopt a device in the form of a label, brand, mark, name, or other character for the purpose of designating the products of the labor of the members thereof. A drawing of such device may be filed in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia and the Recorder shall register same in a book to be provided for such purpose and be entitled to collect $1 for each registration. A certified copy of the drawing may be obtained upon the payment of $1 for each certification.

Feb. 18, 1932, 47 Stat. 50, ch. 47, § 1
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 263, Pub. L. 89-493, § 7(b)
This section is referenced in § 36-202.
1981 Ed., § 48-401.
1973 Ed., § 48-401.